Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-645
Birth defects; findings and duties.

It is hereby found that the occurrence of malformation or inherited disease at the time of birth is a tragedy for the child, the family, and the community, and a matter of vital concern to the public health. In order to provide for the protection and promotion of the health of the citizens of the state, the department shall have the responsibility for the implementation and development of scientific investigations and research concerning the causes, methods of prevention, treatment, and cure of birth defects.

Laws 1972, LB 1203, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 546;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 444.